Maryland, session 2025, HB0826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) [“Interdepartmental Committee” means the Interdepartmental Advisory
Committee on Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs.
(B) “GOVERNOR’S SUBCABINET” MEANS THE GOVERNOR’S SUBCABINET ON
SOCIOECONOMIC PROCUREMENT PARTICIPATION.
(c)] (1) “Minority person” means:
(i) an individual who has been deprived of the opportunity to
develop and keep a competitive position in the economy because of a social or economic
disadvantage that arises from cultural, racial, or other similar causes; or
(ii) a sheltered workshop for individuals with disabilities A
NONPROFIT ENTITY WHICH IS INCORPORATED IN THE STATE OR OTHERWISE
QUALIFIED TO DO BUSINESS IN THE STATE, HAS BEEN DETERMINED BY THE
INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE TO BE EXEMPT FROM TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(3),
(4), OR (6) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, AND IS ORGANIZED TO PROMOTE THE

HOUSE BILL 826 3
INTERESTS OF PEOPLE WITH DISABILITIES A SHELTERED WORKSHOP FOR
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES.
(2) “Minority person” includes:
(i) an Aleut;
(ii) an American Indian;
(iii) a Black;
(iv) an Eskimo;
(v) a Hispanic;
(vi) an Oriental;
(vii) a Puerto Rican; or
(viii) a woman.
[(d)] (C) “Office” means the Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs.
[(e)] (D) “Special Secretary” means the Special Secretary for the Office of Small,
Minority, and Women Business Affairs.
[9–303.1.
(a) There is an Interdepartmental Advisory Committee on Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs.
(b) The Interdepartmental Committee is composed of:
(1) the secretary of each principal department of the Executive Branch of
government, or the secretary’s designee;
(2) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the Superintendent’s designee;
(3) the Secretary of Higher Education, or the Secretary’s designee; and
(4) the Special Secretary.
(c) The Interdepartmental Committee shall:

HOUSE BILL 826
(1) advise the Special Secretary on proposals to implement and enhance
the duties of the Office, including the promotion of employment of minority persons in the
State, and the promotion of the growth and participation of minority business enterprises
in the State;
(2) gather such information the Committee deems necessary to promote
the goals of the Office;
(3) provide such other assistance as may be required to further the
purposes of §§ 9–304 and 9–305 of this subtitle; and
(4) meet at the call of the Special Secretary.]
9–303.1.
(A) THERE IS A GOVERNOR’S SUBCABINET ON SOCIOECONOMIC
PROCUREMENT PARTICIPATION.
(B) THE GOVERNOR’S SUBCABINET IS COMPOSED OF:
(1) THE SPECIAL SECRETARY OF THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF
SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS, WHO SHALL SERVE AS CHAIR
OF THE SUBCABINET;
(2) THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(3) THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(5) THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(6) THE SECRETARY OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT,
OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(7) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(8) THE SECRETARY OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(9) THE SECRETARY OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;

HOUSE BILL 826 5
(10) THE SECRETARY OF TRANSPORTATION, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(11) THE SECRETARY OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(12) THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER FOR THE STATE, OR THE
CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER’S DESIGNEE;
(13) THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE OMBUDSMAN, OR THE
OMBUDSMAN’S DESIGNEE; AND
(14) ANY OTHER HEAD OF A DEPARTMENT OR AGENCY THAT IS
ACCOUNTABLE TO THE GOVERNOR, AS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE GOVERNOR.
(C) THE GOVERNOR’S SUBCABINET SHALL:
(1) MEET:
(I) A MINIMUM OF ONCE EACH QUARTER; AND
(II) AT A FREQUENCY DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE CHAIR;
(2) STUDY SOCIOECONOMIC PROCUREMENT PROGRAMS IN OTHER
STATES TO IDENTIFY SUCCESSES AND BEST PRACTICES;
(3) DEVELOP ACCOUNTABILITY MEASURES FOR PROCUREMENT
FORECASTS, STRATEGIC PLANS, PROCUREMENT REVIEW GROUP PROCESSES, AND
LIAISON OFFICER ACCOUNTABILITY;
(4) WORK WITH THE OFFICE OF STATE PROCUREMENT TO
IMPLEMENT PROCESS IMPROVEMENTS THAT DIRECTLY IMPACT SOCIOECONOMIC
PROCUREMENT BUSINESSES’ ABILITY TO FAIRLY COMPETE FOR AND UNDERSTAND
STATE CONTRACTING OPPORTUNITIES;
(5) IDENTIFY AND RECOMMEND STATUTORY AND REGULATORY
REFORMS TO STRENGTHEN AND IMPROVE THE STATE’S SOCIOECONOMIC
PROCUREMENT PROGRAMS; AND
(6) RECOMMEND ACTIONS TO MAKE IMPROVEMENTS TO THE SMALL
BUSINESS RESERVE PROGRAM, THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM,
AND THE VETERAN SMALL BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 826
(D) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2025, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE GOVERNOR’S SUBCABINET SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR
ON THE GOVERNOR’S SUBCABINET’S ACTIVITIES, PROGRESS, AND
RECOMMENDATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.